District of Columbia statutes.
34-1921.04a

Conduits in public parks or reservations.

Any officer of the United States government charged with the care, maintenance, and supervision of any public park or reservation may grant permission to any company or corporation maintaining and operating a telegraph plant or system in said District on March 3, 1905, or thereafter, upon application being made therefor, to construct conduits, subsidiaries, or manholes in said park or reservation, under such reasonable regulations as said officer may prescribe, unless, in the judgment of said officer, said construction will result in injury to the United States or its properties.

History

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 986, ch. 1415, § 4a

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1413.
1973 Ed., § 43-1413.